Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.030

Source—Interest and earnings.

Interest and earnings from the local improvement guaranty fund shall be paid into the fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.54.030. Prior: 1933 c 109 s 1, part; 1927 c 209 s 3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 3, part; 1923 c 141 s 3, part; RRS s 9351-3, part.]